Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202684-910
Agency; notification to Legislative Oversight Committee; contents; format; notice to Executive Board of the Legislative Council.

(1) On or before July 1 of each year, each agency shall notify the Legislative Oversight Committee of the status of all rules and regulations pending before the agency that are required by law and that have not been adopted and promulgated. If such rules and regulations have not been adopted and promulgated within the time required pursuant to section 84-901.01, the agency shall provide an explanation to the committee stating why the agency has not adopted and promulgated such rules and regulations. If an additional appropriation was made with respect to legislation enacted to provide funding for or additional staff to implement a program for which rules and regulations are required to be adopted, the notification shall include what the funding has been used for and what functions the staff have been performing while such rules and regulations are pending. The format of the notification shall be established by the committee and shall be updated periodically.

(2) On or before July 1 of each year, each agency shall notify the Executive Board of the Legislative Council of the status of any rule or regulation pending before the agency that constitutes an occupational regulation as defined in section 84-940 and that has not been adopted and promulgated. The executive board shall forward any notification received pursuant to this subsection to the standing committee of the Legislature with jurisdiction over such rule or regulation.

Laws 2011, LB617, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 229;

Laws 2013, LB222, § 44;

Laws 2018, LB299, § 19;

Laws 2018, LB751, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB909, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 106.